California, session 20252026, SB1289.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25154.5 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:25154.5. Non-RCRA hazardous waste that is destined for land disposal shall only be disposed of in a landfill regulated by Subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976 (Subchapter III (commencing with Section 6921) of Chapter 82 of Title 42 of the United States Code).SEC. 2.  No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 25150.5 of the Health and Safety Code is repealed.